test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_njuodas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - njuođâs: # ok, MLO
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Nom: njuođâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Gen: njuottâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Acc: njuottâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Ill: njuottâsân
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Loc: njuottâsist
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Com: njuottâsáin
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Abe: njuottâsttáá
    njuođâs+N+Ess: njuođâsin
    njuođâs+N+Par: njuođâsid
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Nom: njuottâseh
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Gen: njuottâsij
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Acc: njuottâsijd
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Ill: njuottâsáid
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Loc: njuottâsijn
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Com: njuottâsijguin
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Abe: njuottâsijttáá
